Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2906
Direct supervision, defined.

Direct supervision means supervision in which the supervising practitioner is physically present and immediately available and does not include supervision provided by means of telecommunication.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 124;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,368;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 999.